Rhode Island, session 2025, SB150.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. The general assembly makes the following findings of fact:
(1) Firearm silencers are currently regulated under 1934 National Firearms Act (NFA) and
the Gun Control Act of 1968 (GCA).
(2) As part of the Internal Revenue Code, the NFA taxes all aspects of the manufacture and
distribution of silencers and compels disclosure of the production and distribution system from
manufacturer to buyer. To deal in silencers, an individual is required to be the holder of a federal
firearms license (FFL) under the GCA and a special occupational taxpayer (SOT) under the NFA.
The NFA imposes a two hundred dollar ($200) making tax on unlicensed persons and a two hundred
dollar ($200) transfer tax for transfers to unlicensed persons. ATF places a tax stamp on a transfer
document upon the transfer's approval, and the transferee may not take possession of the silencer
until he or she holds that document. Under the NFA, individuals must undergo a fingerprint-based
criminal history background check, which is arguably more thorough than a name-based check.
There is no deadline for the completion of such checks. It is a felony to receive, possess, or transfer
an unregistered NFA weapon to include silencers. Such offenses are punishable by up to ten (10)
years imprisonment.
(3) Regulated and legal silencers are rarely used in criminal activity.
(4) Use of silencers can assist in protecting the hearing of firearm shooters engaged in
lawful sporting and target shooting activities by reducing, but not eliminating gunshot noise.
(5) Use of silencers benefit neighbors and public near lawful shooting clubs and ranges by

creating a quieter and more peaceful environment.
(6) Forty-two (42) states currently allow private ownership of silencers.
SECTION 2. Section 11-47-20 of the General Laws in Chapter 11-47 entitled "Weapons"
is hereby amended to read as follows:
11-47-20. Sale or possession of silencers.
(a) It shall be unlawful within this state to manufacture, sell, purchase, or possess any
muffler, silencer, or device for deadening or muffling the sound of a firearm when discharged as
defined by 18 U.S.C. § 921(a)(24) unless the person complies with the provisions of the National
Firearms Act (NFA), 26 U.S.C. § 5849, and the Gun Control Act (GCA) of 1968, as amended 18
U.S.C. chapter 44, § 921 et seq.; provided, however, that law enforcement officers utilizing said
devices while acting within the scope of their official duties, as tactical teams and under the direct
supervision of the police chief or the colonel of the state police or their designee, shall not be in
violation of this section.
(b) Violations of this section shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than one year
and one day.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000359
========
LC000359 - Page 2 of 3